Utah statutes.
32B-6-804.   Specific licensing requirements for reception center license.

(1)  To obtain a reception center license a person shall comply with Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process.

(2) (a)  A reception center license expires on October 31 of each year.

(b)  To renew a person's reception center license, a person shall comply with the renewal requirements of Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, by no later than September 30.

(3) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for a reception center license is $300.

(b)  The initial license fee for a reception center license is $750.

(c)  The renewal fee for a reception center license is $750.

(4)  The bond amount required for a reception center license is the penal sum of $10,000.



Enacted by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

